Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Habitual Criminals

Trial court's determination that sentence under article was inappropriate effectively nullified jury's determination

that the defendant was an habitual criminal. Pote v. State, 695 P.2d 617,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1985).

§ 6-10-201.
“Habitual criminal” defined; penalties.

A person is an habitual criminal if:

He is convicted of a violent felony; and

He has been convicted of a felony on two (2) or more previous charges separately brought and tried which arose out of separate occurrences in this state or elsewhere.

An habitual criminal shall be punished by imprisonment for:

Not less than ten (10) years nor more than fifty (50) years, if he has two (2) previous convictions;

Life, if he has three (3) or more previous convictions for offenses committed after the person reached the age of eighteen (18) years of age.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2013 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to identification of criminals and keeping information on same, see §§

9-1-623

through

9-1-627

.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, added “offenses committed after the person reached the age of eighteen (18) years of age” in (b)(ii).

Equal protection not violated. —

The inclusion of involuntary manslaughter in the definition of violent crimes and the exclusion of aggravated vehicular homicide is not an arbitrary and capricious classification in violation of equal protection. Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1224, 105 S. Ct. 1215, 84 L. Ed. 2d 356, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 1062 (U.S. 1985); Bell v. State, 693 P.2d 769,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1985).

No ex post facto violation. —

Habitual criminal enhancement statute does not violate constitutional prohibition against ex post facto laws.
Smith v. State, 2009 WY 2, 199 P.3d 1052,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2009).

Victim's compensation surcharge. —

Imposing a
victim's compensation surcharge did not make the habitual offender
statute unconstitutional under prohibitions against double jeopardy
and enacting ex post facto laws because the surcharge was statutorily
authorized. Bird v. State, 2015 WY 108, 356 P.3d 264,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2015).

No separate sentences for felony and habitual offender status. —

Sentencing a defendant for a felony and then sentencing him again for his status as an habitual offender would violate the double jeopardy prohibition. Evans v. State, 655 P.2d 1214,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1982).

Being an habitual criminal is not a crime — it is a status. —

To be an habitual criminal under this section simply changes the sentencing process so that the sentence which could be imposed for the crime charged (if less than life imprisonment) becomes enhanced to a mandatory life sentence. Schuler v. State, 668 P.2d 1333,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 359

(Wyo. 1983).

Habitual criminal statute does not punish a defendant for his previous offenses but for his persistence in crime; hence, the use of defendant's prior convictions to enhance his aggravated assault convictions did not violate his right against double jeopardy. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

Remand for habitual criminal proceeding not double jeopardy. —

Since an habitual criminal proceeding is not for a criminal offense, a remand for additional proceedings therein do not constitute double jeopardy in violation of an accused's constitutional right. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Increasing sentence on remand prohibited. —

See Simonds v. State, 799 P.2d 1210,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1990).

Section not impermissible usurpation of judicial powers or prerogatives. —

This section is not an impermissible legislative usurpation of the court's prerogatives, is not an unconstitutional encroachment on the power of the judiciary and does not violate the separation of powers clause of the constitution. Evans v. State, 655 P.2d 1214,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1982).

Rationale supporting habitual criminal statutes. —

See Evans v. State, 655 P.2d 1214,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1982).

“Violent felony.” —

Indecent liberties is not a “violent felony” as that phrase is defined by Wyoming law. Cooley v. State, 885 P.2d 875,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1994).

The initially imposed sentences following the defendant's conviction for child abuse were illegal as a matter of law given that the habitual criminal statute applies only to “violent felonies” and that the statutory definition of violent felonies does not include felony child abuse. Rodgriguez v. State, 917 P.2d 172,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. June 11, 1996).

Aggravated robbery is a “violent felony” within the meaning of this section. —

While the legislature, in § 6-1-104(a)(xii), has defined “violent felony” to include robbery, and while aggravated robbery is not listed separately, it does not logically follow that the legislature would conclude that robbery is a violent felony while aggravated robbery is not. Oakley v. State, 715 P.2d 1374,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1986).

Section requires previous conviction, not previous crime. —

This section does not require that a crime be previously committed, only that there is a previous conviction. Green v. State, 784 P.2d 1360,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1989).

Sentence enhancement requires separate charges and occurrences. —

The ordinary and plain meaning of the terms “separately brought” and “separate occurrences” required for sentence enhancement refers to more than just the conviction. These terms refer as well to charges and occurrences separate from each other. Green v. State, 784 P.2d 1360,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1989).

But statute allows enhancing sentences for multiple convictions arising from same occurrence. —

The purpose of this section is to provide additional punishment for people who have not been deterred by previous penalties, and that purpose applies regardless of whether the habitual criminal commits more than one felony during a single occurrence or more than one felony in separate occurrences; hence, a trial court did not abuse its discretion when it enhanced each sentence for each of defendant's convictions of a violent felony arising out of his attempted escape from police by car and on foot and his shooting at police. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

Where the evidence showed that the defendant subjected the victim to both vaginal and anal sexual penetration, these acts constituted separate, forcible sexual intrusions on the victim and proof of different facts was required to establish the elements of each crime, creating a record showing that the defendant's convictions were for separate and distinct crimes. It was, therefore, appropriate for the district court to consider the defendant's convictions as separate and distinct crimes for the purpose of imposing consecutive life sentences pursuant to the habitual criminal statute. Brown v. State, 2004 WY 119, 99 P.3d 489,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. Nov. 16, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 966, 125 S. Ct. 1743, 161 L. Ed. 2d 612, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3057 (U.S. 2005).

Two consecutive life sentences proper. —

In a sexual assault case, the defendant, a felony recidivist, was properly sentenced to two consecutive life sentences where defendant subjected the victim to both vaginal and anal sexual penetration, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-302

.Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Out-of-state convictions. —

The fact that a criminal defendant's previous felony convictions in other states may not be felonies in Wyoming is immaterial to the application of this section. Gunderson v. State, 925 P.2d 1300,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. Oct. 29, 1996).

District court
properly sentenced defendant to life in prison because a rational
trier of fact could have concluded that he committed a felony offense
in Ohio and that he was the individual who committed first-degree
sexual assault and third-degree sexual abuse of a minor; the testimony
of a court clerk from Ohio showed that defendant was convicted of
a felony in Ohio, and the State proved that defendant committed all
three crimes being used against him to prove he was a habitual offender. Rogers v. State, 2015 WY 48, 346 P.3d 934,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2015).

Burden of proof. —

A defendant mounting a constitutional challenge to an underlying conviction in an habitual offender proceeding must make a prima facie showing that one or more of his underlying convictions was not obtained in accordance with his constitutional rights. Once the defendant makes this showing, the prosecution has the burden of establishing, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the conviction was constitutionally obtained. Johnston v. State, 829 P.2d 1179,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1992).

Sentence enhancement requires separate charges and occurrences.—

District court properly enhanced the penalties for defendant’s aggravated assault and battery convictions because defendant had been convicted of two prior felonies separately brought and tried even though they were resolved in a single plea agreement and judgment and sentence. Thompson v. State, 2018 WY 3, 408 P.3d 756,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2018).

Improper for judge to consider probation upon fourth felony. —

Under this section, the life sentence for the fourth felony is mandatory, and it is improper for the trial judge to consider probation. Schuler v. State, 668 P.2d 1333,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 359

(Wyo. 1983).

Ten-to-20 year sentence for armed robbery constitutional, even though defendant used nonfunctional gun. —

A 10-to-20 year sentence for a third felony conviction (armed robbery) is not cruel and unusual punishment, violative of either the eighth amendment to the United States constitution, or art. 1, § 14 of the Wyoming constitution, even though the defendant allegedly deliberately chose to use a nonfunctional gun, unloaded and absent a firing pin, to consciously avoid violence and harm. Oakley v. State, 715 P.2d 1374,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1986).

And humane. —

The trial judge imposed a 10-to-20 year sentence for armed robbery under this section with the humane principles of reformation and prevention required by art. I, § 15, Wyo. Const. (humane penal code) foremost in mind. Prior to imposing sentence, the trial judge heard testimony from a psychiatrist regarding the defendant's personality disorder, and reviewed, in the presence of the defendant, counsel and the jury, the defendant's history of drug abuse, his unhappy family history, the culpability of his past crimes, and the fact that he used an unloaded weapon in the aggravated robbery. Oakley v. State, 715 P.2d 1374,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1986).

Prejudicial error. —

Where defendant fired two shots at police officers and was subsequently convicted of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon, even assuming, for purposes of defendant's appeal of the habitual offender charge, validity of alleged errors that he was denied due process and a fair trial, that his pretrial motion to dismiss the habitual offender charge was improperly denied, and that there was prosecutorial misconduct, defendant failed to show that he was prejudiced by those errors; his belief that his sentence would have been more lenient if he pled guilty was purely speculative, ignored the district court's duty to consider the crime and its circumstances, and disregarded the fact that the officers' testimony would have come before the district court at sentencing even if defendant had pled guilty to the aggravated assault charge. Hopson v. State, 2006 WY 32, 130 P.3d 494,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2006).

Record authenticity. —

Sufficient evidence supported a habitual offender conviction, despite objections to the level of authenticity of some conviction records, because this issue related to the weight of the evidence. Lopez v. State, 2006 WY 97, 139 P.3d 445,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Scherer v. Wyoming, 278 F.2d 469,

1960 U.S. App. LEXIS 4850

(10th Cir. 1960); Orcutt v. State, 366 P.2d 690,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1961); Whiteley v. State, 418 P.2d 164,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1966); Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971); Connor v. State, 537 P.2d 715,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1975); Munoz v. Maschner, 590 P.2d 1352,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1979); Montez v. State, 670 P.2d 694,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1983); Simonds v. State, 762 P.2d 1189,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1988); Rich v. State, 899 P.2d 1345,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Wyoming. Waxler v. State, 67 Wyo. 396, 224 P.2d 514,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1950); Jones v. State, 771 P.2d 368,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1989); Keene v. State, 812 P.2d 147,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1991); Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000); Skinner v. State, 2001 WY 102, 33 P.3d 758,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2001); Kearns v. State, 2002 WY 97, 48 P.3d 1090,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2002); DeLoge v. State, 2002 WY 155, 55 P.3d 1233,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Allman v. State, 677 P.2d 832,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 264

(Wyo. 1984); Smith v. State, 715 P.2d 1164,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 514

(Wyo. 1986); Price v. State, 716 P.2d 324,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Grubbs v. State, 669 P.2d 929,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1983); Evans v. State, 892 P.2d 796,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1995); Bird v. State, 901 P.2d 1123,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1995); Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996); Wilson v. State, 14 P.3d 912,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 2000); Spinner v. State, 2003 WY 106, 75 P.3d 1016,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2003); Lacey v. State, 2003 WY 148, 79 P.3d 493,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2003); Hannon v. State, 2004 WY 8, 84 P.3d 320,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(2004); Evenson v. State, 2008 WY 24, 177 P.3d 819,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Mar. 5, 2008); Cohen v. State, 2008 WY 78,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(July 14, 2008); Chapman v. State, 2013 WY 57,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(May 10, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For a criticism of the Wyoming Habitual Criminal Act, see 6 Wyo. L.J. 311.

For comment on procedure requisite to accepting a guilty plea in Wyoming, see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 607 (1967).

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes former “conviction” within statute enhancing penalty for second or subsequent offense, 5 ALR2d 1080.

Necessity of proof of identity for purposes of statute as to enhanced punishment in case of prior conviction, 11 ALR2d 870.

Chronological or procedural sequence of former convictions as affecting enhancement of penalty for subsequent offense under habitual criminal statute, 24 ALR2d 1247.

Pardon as affecting consideration of earlier conviction in applying habitual criminal statute, 31 ALR2d 1186.

Propriety, under statute enhancing punishment for second or subsequent offense, of restricting new trial to issue of status as habitual criminal, 79 ALR2d 826.

Convictions under Dyer Act (National Motor Theft Act) as ground for enhancement of penalty under state habitual criminal statutes, 65 ALR3d 586.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding prior convictions, 14 ALR4th 227.

Propriety of using single prior felony conviction as basis for offense of possessing weapon by convicted felon and to enhance sentence, 37 ALR4th 1168.

Chronological or procedural sequence of former convictions as affecting enhancement of penalty under habitual offender statutes, 7 ALR5th 263.

Pardoned or expunged conviction as “prior offense” under state statute or regulation enhancing punishment for subsequent conviction, 97 ALR5th 293.

§ 6-10-202.
Penalties not affected.

Nothing in this article shall abrogate or affect:

The punishment of death in crimes for which the death penalty is imposed;

The punishment of life imprisonment without parole in cases in which that penalty is imposed.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1996, ch. 73, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to execution of death sentence, see §

7-13-901

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Rationale supporting habitual criminal statutes. —

See Evans v. State, 655 P.2d 1214,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1982).

Applied

in

Scherer v. Wyoming, 278 F.2d 469,

1960 U.S. App. LEXIS 4850

(10th Cir. 1960); Orcutt v. State, 366 P.2d 690,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1961); Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971); Connor v. State, 537 P.2d 715,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1975); Munoz v. Maschner, 590 P.2d 1352,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding prior convictions, 14 ALR4th 227.

§ 6-10-203.
Information or indictment; trial; prima facie evidence of previous convictions.

An information or indictment which charges a person as an habitual criminal shall set forth the charged felony and allege the previous convictions.

The trial on the charged felony shall proceed as in other cases, but the jury shall not be informed of the previous convictions. If the defendant is convicted of the charged felony and does not plead guilty to the charge of the previous convictions, he shall be tried immediately by the same jury or judge on the charge of the previous convictions.

In a trial under this article, a duly authenticated copy of the record of previous convictions and judgments against the defendant of any court of record are prima facie evidence of the previous convictions and may be used in evidence against the defendant.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Previous convictions need not precede commission of offense charged;

rather, the state is only required to allege and prove two prior convictions under the habitual criminal statutes. Wyoming. Waxler v. State, 67 Wyo. 396, 224 P.2d 514,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1950).

Prior convictions required to be set forth in information.—

A defendant's claim that paragraphs in the information which described prior convictions should be deleted from the information is without merit since this section expressly requires the prior convictions to be set forth in the information. This section makes the prior conviction a part of the description and character of the offense intended to be punished. Wyoming. Waxler v. State, 67 Wyo. 396, 224 P.2d 514,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1950).

Proof of prior conviction. —

In a criminal prosecution wherein the defendant is accused of a prior conviction, two questions of fact are presented. The first is whether the prior judgment has been rendered. The second is whether the person named in the prior judgment is the same person now accused of that prior conviction. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Sufficient evidence of prior conviction. —

In view of the certificates of the conviction of the clerk of a United States district court and the admission of the defendant that he had been arrested for bank robbery, a judgment of conviction in that court has been sufficiently shown. Orcutt v. State, 366 P.2d 690,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1961).

But concordance of names of accused and of person previously convicted is not sufficient

to establish prima facie evidence of identity for the purpose of a habitual criminal charge. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Admission of court files and records not unconstitutional.—

The admission into evidence of court files and records on the issue of the defendant's habitual criminal status did not violate his constitutional right to confront witnesses against him. Amin v. State, 695 P.2d 1021,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1985).

No preliminary hearing on habitual criminal allegations. —

As the habitual criminal statute is a vehicle for enhancing a sentence upon a conviction for crime and is not a separate crime, a defendant is not entitled to a preliminary hearing on habitual criminal allegations. Montez v. State, 670 P.2d 694,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1983).

Absence of charge from original complaint not fatal where adequatenotice. —

Where the defendant has timely and adequate notice of an habitual criminal allegation, it is not error to deny his motion to strike the habitual criminal charge from the information on the ground it was not included in the original complaint. Montez v. State, 670 P.2d 694,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1983).

No right to jury trial with respect to prior misdemeanor convictions.—

The Wyoming habitual criminal statutes do not by their terms encompass misdemeanor convictions for driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. With respect to such sentence enhancement proceedings under the state statute or a similar city ordinance, unless the statutory language so requires, a right to a jury trial with respect to the existence of prior convictions does not exist. Jaramillo v. Green River, 719 P.2d 655,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1986).

Use of prior convictions for impeachment only. —

This section does not bar the use of prior felony convictions, when used for impeachment purposes and where the following procedures are employed: the court allows the defendant to be impeached at the trial on the underlying felony by permitting his cross-examination on prior convictions; the court then immediately gives the jury a limiting instruction to the effect that testimony regarding prior convictions is to be considered only for the purpose of impeachment and not as any evidence of guilt; and, at the trial on the defendant's status as an habitual criminal, the state proves the prior convictions independently of the defendant's admissions under cross-examination, so that his prior admissions are not used against him in this phase of the trial. Montez v. State, 670 P.2d 694,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1983).

Notice required before sentence enhanced for prior drivingwhile intoxicated. —

The statutory requirement that the sentence to be imposed for driving while intoxicated be more severe as the number of prior convictions of the defendant increases makes said statute a habitual criminal act. Before the sentence of a defendant can be so enhanced, he must have notice of the fact that such is contemplated; generally, the notice must be contained in the information or charge under which he is prosecuted. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

Jury trial applicable where remand for sentencing. —

The provisions of subsection (b) relative to a jury trial should be followed insofar as possible upon remand for further proceedings relative to sentencing on the issue of habitual criminality. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Waiver of right. —

Defendant knowingly and voluntarily waived his right to have jury panel discharged and new jury impaneled after the judge mistakenly read the habitual criminal charge, which included information regarding his previous felony convictions; a defendant may waive the right to not have a jury be informed of prior convictions for purposes of the habitual criminal statute until the habitual criminal phase of the trial. Kearns v. State, 2002 WY 97, 48 P.3d 1090,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2002).

Consideration of mitigating circumstances not constitutionallyrequired. —

There is no constitutional infirmity in the habitual criminal statutes because of the lack of a procedure, similar to that in the death penalty statutes, for presenting mitigating circumstances. Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1224, 105 S. Ct. 1215, 84 L. Ed. 2d 356, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 1062 (U.S. 1985).

Irrelevant defenses. —

The defenses of mitigating evidence, good character and nonhabitual conduct are matters not ordinarily relevant in the factual determinations made during a proceeding under the habitual criminal statutes. Evans v. State, 655 P.2d 1214,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1982).

Applied

in

Bandy v. Hehn, 10 Wyo. 167, 67 P. 979,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1902); Spiker v. State, 427 P.2d 858,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(1967); Munoz v. Maschner, 590 P.2d 1352,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1979); Bird v. State, 939 P.2d 735,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1997); Skinner v. State, 2001 WY 102, 33 P.3d 758,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Spinner v. State, 2003 WY 106, 75 P.3d 1016,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For comment on procedure requisite to accepting a guilty plea in Wyoming, see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 607 (1967).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Form and sufficiency of allegations as to time, place or court of prior offenses or convictions, under habitual criminal act, 80 ALR2d 1196.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding prior convictions, 14 ALR4th 227.